Massachusetts, session 194th, S1496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 96 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, after the words “as approved by the”, the word
“board”, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “Massachusetts Chiropractic
Society” and by striking out , in line 15, after the words “as approved by the”, the word “board”,
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “Massachusetts Chiropractic Society”.
of 1